California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
The appeals board, or the executive officer subject to its direction and control to whom it delegates such responsibility, shall appoint and direct the activities of one or more impartial administrative law judges who shall hear and render a decision in every matter in which a petition is filed with, or an appeal is taken to, an administrative law judge as provided in this division. The compensation of the administrative law judges shall be fixed by the State Personnel Board at a rate comparable to that of other administrative law judges or hearing officers in state service whose duties and responsibilities are comparable, without regard to whether such other positions have membership in the State Bar of California as a prerequisite to appointment. No administrative law judge shall participate in any case in which he is an interested party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

The appeals board shall appoint a chief administrative law judge who shall be a member in good standing of the State Bar of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

The duties of the chief administrative law judge include:

(a) Serving as the chief executive of the board in the administration of the activities of administrative law judges and their staffs.

(b) Maintaining a continuous review of the decisions of administrative law judges from which no appeal is taken to uncover decisions which appear inconsistent with the law, with established judicial decisions, with prior decisions of the board or with each other and recommending such cases to the appeals board for certification to itself for a further hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

In any case before it, the appeals board may delegate to any one of its members or to a special examiner or administrative law judge the taking or hearing of evidence. The appeals board and its duly authorized representatives in the performance of its duties under this division shall have the powers of a head of a department as set forth in Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

All decisions and orders of the Appeals Board shall be in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1656.)
-------------------------------------------

409.

The chairperson shall assign cases before the board to any two members of the board for consideration and decision. Assignments by the chairperson of members to the cases shall be rotated so as to equalize the workload of the members, but with the composition of the members so assigned being varied and changed to assure that there shall never be a fixed and continuous composition of members. Except as otherwise provided, the decision of the two members assigned the case shall be the decision of the appeals board. In the event that the two members do not concur in the decision, the chairperson or another member of the board designated by the chairperson shall be assigned to the panel and shall resolve the impasse. A case shall be considered and decided by the appeals board acting as a whole at the request of any member of the appeals board.

The appeals board shall meet as a whole when the chairperson may direct to consider and pass on any matters that the chairperson may bring before it, and to consider and decide cases that present issues of first impression or that will enable the appeals board to achieve uniformity of decisions by the respective members.

The appeals board, acting as a whole, may designate certain of its decisions as precedents. Precedent decisions of the appeals board are subject to Section 11425.60 of the Government Code. The appeals board, acting as a whole, may, on its own motion, reconsider a previously issued decision solely to determine whether or not the decision shall be designated as a precedent decision. Decisions of the appeals board acting as a whole shall be by a majority vote of its members. The director and the appeals board administrative law judges shall be controlled by those precedents except as modified by judicial review. If the appeals board issues decisions other than those designated as precedent decisions, anything incorporated in those decisions shall be physically attached to and be made a part of the decisions. The appeals board may make a reasonable charge as it deems necessary to defray the costs of publication and distribution of its precedent decisions and index of precedent decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

409.1.

If a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction reverses or declares invalid a precedent decision of the appeals board issued under Section 409 or this section, the appeals board, acting as a whole, shall promptly modify the precedent decision to conform in all respects to the judgment of the court. The modified precedent decision shall supersede the prior precedent decision for all purposes. The appeals board shall promptly notify the director, the administrative law judges of the appeals board, and all other subscribers to the precedent decisions, of the modified precedent decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

409.2.

Any interested person or organization may bring an action for declaratory relief in the superior court in accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure to obtain a judicial declaration as to the validity of any precedent decision of the appeals board issued under Section 409 or 409.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

410.

A decision of the appeals board is final, except for such action as may be taken by a judicial tribunal as permitted or required by law.

A decision of the appeals board is binding on the director with respect to the parties involved in the particular appeal.

The director shall have the right to seek judicial review from an appeals board decision irrespective of whether or not he or she appeared or participated in the appeal to the administrative law judge or to the appeals board.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the right of the director, or of any other party except as provided by Sections 1241, 1243, and 5313, to seek judicial review from an appeals board decision shall be exercised not later than six months after the date of the decision of the appeals board or the date on which the decision is designated as a precedent decision, whichever is later.

The appeals board shall attach to all of its decisions where a request for review may be taken, an explanation of the party’s right to seek such review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

The appeals board, acting as a whole, may promulgate rules or amend or rescind rules pertaining to hearing appeals and other matters falling within its jurisdiction. All these rules, amendments thereto, or repeals thereof, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 297.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

(a) The appeals board acting as a whole may, by notice mailed to the director and the parties prior to the mailing of an administrative law judge’s decision on an appeal or petition under this division pending before any administrative law judge, on its own motion either:

(1) Transfer the proceedings to another administrative law judge; or

(2) Remove the proceedings to itself for review and decision.

(b) If the appeals board removes any proceedings to itself for review and decision pursuant to this section, the appeals board may order the taking of additional evidence and may affirm, reverse, modify, or set aside any findings or action of the department from which the appeal or petition to the administrative law judge was taken in the proceedings. The appeals board shall promptly notify the department and the parties to the proceedings of its order or decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

(a) The appeals board acting as a whole may, by notice mailed to the director and the parties not later than 30 days after the mailing of an administrative law judge’s decision on an appeal or petition under this division to the administrative law judge, on its own motion either:

(1) Set aside the decision of the administrative law judge and remand the proceedings to another administrative law judge for review and decision; or

(2) Remove the proceedings to itself for review and decision.

(b) If the appeals board removes any proceedings to itself for review and decision pursuant to this section, the appeals board may order the taking of additional evidence and may affirm, reverse, modify or set aside the decision of the administrative law judge. The appeals board shall promptly notify the department and the parties to the proceedings of its order or decision.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no decision of an administrative law judge under this division shall be final if the appeals board pursuant to this section sets aside such decision or removes the proceedings to itself for review and decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Interstate and Federal Cooperation [451. - 456.]

451.

The administration of this division and of other state and federal unemployment compensation and public employment service laws will be promoted by cooperation between this State and such other states and the appropriate federal agencies in exchanging services, and making available facilities and information. The director may make investigations, secure and transmit information, make available services and facilities and exercise the other powers provided with respect to the administration of this division which he finds necessary or appropriate to facilitate the administration of any state or federal unemployment compensation or public employment service law, and may accept and utilize information, services and facilities made available to this State by an agency charged with the administration of any such other state or federal law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

To the extent permissible under the laws and Constitution of the United States, the director may enter into or cooperate in arrangements whereby facilities and services provided under the unemployment compensation law of any foreign government, may be utilized for the taking of claims and the payment of benefits under the Unemployment Insurance Law of this State or a similar law of such government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 449.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

To encourage cooperation between this state and other states in the enforcement of the unemployment insurance law of each state and to further coordinate the nationwide system of unemployment insurance in the United States and its territories:

(a) The courts of this state shall recognize and enforce liabilities for unemployment contributions, penalties, interest, and benefit overpayments imposed by other states which extend a like comity to this state.

(b) The Attorney General may commence action in any other jurisdiction by and in the name of the department to collect unemployment contributions, penalties, interest, and benefit overpayments legally due this state. The officials of other states which extend a like comity to this state may sue for the collection of such contributions, penalties, interest, and benefit overpayments in the courts of this state. A certificate by the Secretary of State under the Great Seal of the state that the officers of the department designated by the director have authority to collect the contributions, penalties, interest, and benefit overpayments is conclusive evidence of such authority.

(c) The Attorney General may commence action in this state as agent for and on behalf of any other state to enforce judgments and liabilities for unemployment insurance contributions, penalties, interest and benefit overpayments due such state which extends a like comity to this state. The requesting state shall pay the court costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1720.)
-------------------------------------------

454.

The director may enter into reciprocal arrangements with authorized agencies of other states or of the Federal Government, or both, whereby:

(a) Services customarily performed in more than one state by an individual for a single employer shall be deemed to be services performed entirely within any one of the states (i) in which any part of the individual’s service is performed, or (ii) in which the individual has his residence, or (iii) in which the employer maintains a place of business, if there is in effect as to such services an election by the employing unit with the acquiescence of the individual, approved by the agency charged with the administration of such state’s unemployment compensation law pursuant to which all the services performed by such individual for such employer are deemed to be performed entirely within such state.

(b) Services on vessels engaged in interstate commerce wherever performed shall be deemed performed within this State or any other state on the basis of the location of the operating office of the employer from which the operations of the vessel are ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed, directed, and controlled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

455.

The director may enter into reciprocal arrangements with authorized agencies of other states or of the Federal Government, or both, whereby:

(a) Potential rights to benefits accumulated under the unemployment compensation laws of one or more states or of the Federal Government, or both, may constitute the basis for the payment of benefits through a single appropriate agency under terms which the director finds will be fair and reasonable to all affected interests and which will not result in any substantial loss to the fund.

(b) Wages or services in employment subject to an unemployment compensation law of another state or of the Federal Government shall be deemed to be wages in employment for employers for the purpose of determining an individual’s rights to unemployment compensation benefits under this part, and wages in employment for employers as defined in this part shall be deemed to be wages or services on the basis of which unemployment compensation under the law of another state or of the Federal Government is payable, but no such arrangement shall be entered into unless it contains provisions for reimbursements to the Unemployment Fund for such of the unemployment compensation benefits paid under this part upon the basis of such wages or services, and provisions for reimbursements from the Unemployment Fund for such of the compensation paid under such other law upon the basis of wages for employment as defined in this part as the director finds will be fair and reasonable to all affected interests. Reimbursements paid from the Unemployment Fund pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be unemployment compensation benefits for the purposes of this part. The director may make to other state and federal agencies and receive from such other state or federal agencies reimbursements from or to the fund, in accordance with arrangements entered into pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

455.5.

This state shall participate in any arrangements for the payment of compensation on the basis of combining an individual’s wages and employment covered under this division with his wages and employment covered under the unemployment compensation law of other states which are approved by the Secretary of Labor in consultation with the state unemployment compensation agencies as reasonably calculated to assure the prompt and full payment of compensation in such situations. Any such arrangement shall include provisions for both of the following:

(a) Applying the base period of a single state law to a claim involving the combining of an individual’s wages and employment covered under two or more state laws.

(b) Avoiding duplicate use of wages and employment by reason of such combining.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

455.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, benefits shall not be denied or reduced to an individual solely because he files a claim in another state, or a contiguous country with which the United States has an agreement with respect to unemployment compensation, or because he resides in another state or such a contiguous country at the time he files a claim for unemployment compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

456.

The director may enter into reciprocal arrangements with authorized agencies of other states or of the Federal Government, or both, whereby employer contributions due under this part with respect to wages for employment shall be deemed to have been paid to the Unemployment Fund of this State as of the date payment of such contributions was made under another state or federal unemployment compensation law. No arrangement shall be entered into pursuant to this section unless it contains provisions for such reimbursement to the fund of such contributions and the actual earnings thereon as the director finds will be fair and reasonable to all affected interests. The director may collect contributions in like manner for such agencies of other states and the Federal Government administering unemployment compensation laws and remit such contributions to such agencies under appropriate reciprocal arrangements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Scope or Coverage [601. - 832.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employment [601. - 611.]

601.

“Employment” means service, including service in interstate commerce, performed by an employee for wages or under any contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

601.5.

For the purpose of this division only, “employment” includes any service in an artistic or literary capacity performed by an individual pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and a labor organization in the motion picture, radio or television industry where the employer has the right to control and direct the services to be performed and the individual is defined as an employee under the terms of the collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1786.)
-------------------------------------------

602.

“Employment” includes an individual’s entire service, performed within, or both within and without, the state if one of the following is met:

(a) The service is localized in the state.

(b) The service is not localized in any state, but some of the service is performed in the state and one of the following is met:

(1) The base of operations, or, if there is no base of operations, then the place from which that service is directed or controlled is in the state.

(2) The base of operations or place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any
 state in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in the state.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (b), employment of an individual who is a motion picture production worker, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 679, includes the individual’s entire service if their residence is in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 246, Sec. 2.   (SB 271)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

Service is localized within a state if either of the following apply:

(a) The service is performed entirely within the state.

(b) (1) The service is performed both within and without the state, but the service performed without the state is incidental to the individual’s service within the state; for example, is temporary or transitory in nature, or consists of isolated transactions.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the service outside the state of an individual who is a motion picture production worker, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 679, is temporary or transitory if
 all of the following are met:

(A) The worker is a resident of the state.

(B) The worker is hired and dispatched from the state.

(C) The worker intends to return to the state to seek reemployment at the conclusion of the assignment outside the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 246, Sec. 3.   (SB 271)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

603.5.

“Employment” includes an individual’s entire service, wherever performed within the United States or Canada, if such service is not covered under the unemployment compensation law of any other state or Canada, and the place from which the service is directed or controlled is in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

604.

“Employment” includes an individual’s entire service, if such service is deemed performed in this State by virtue of an arrangement made pursuant to this division and does not include any service which by virtue of such an arrangement is deemed performed in another state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

(a) Except as provided by Section 634.5, “employment” for the purposes of this part and Parts 3 (commencing with Section 3501) and 4 (commencing with Section 4001) includes all service performed by an individual (including blind and otherwise disabled individuals) for any public entity or Indian tribe, if the service is excluded from “employment” under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act solely by reason of Section 3306(c)(7) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Public entity” means the State of California (including the Trustees of the California State University and Colleges, and the California Industries for the Blind), an
 instrumentality of this state (including the Regents of the University of California), a political subdivision of this state or any of its instrumentalities, a county, city, district (including the governing board of a school district or community college district, a county board of education, a county superintendent of schools, or a personnel commission of a school district or community college district that has a merit system pursuant to the Education Code), entities conducting fairs as identified in Sections 3101 to 3104, inclusive, of the Food and Agricultural Code, a public authority, public agency, or public corporation of this state, an instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing, and an instrumentality of any of the foregoing and one or more other states or political subdivisions.

(2) “Indian tribe” means an Indian tribe described by Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 81.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

606.

Each individual employed to perform or to assist in performing the work of any individual employed by an employing unit shall be deemed to be employed by that employing unit for all the purposes of this division, whether or not he was hired or paid directly by the employing unit if the employing unit had actual or constructive knowledge of the work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

606.5.

(a) Whether an individual or entity is the employer of specific employees shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 621, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) As used in this section, a “temporary services employer” and a “leasing employer” is an employing unit that contracts with clients or customers to supply workers to perform services for the client or customer and performs all of the following functions:

(1) Negotiates with clients or customers for such matters as time, place, type of work, working conditions, quality, and price of the services.

(2) Determines
 assignments or reassignments of workers, even though workers retain the right to refuse specific assignments.

(3) Retains the authority to assign or reassign a worker to other clients or customers when a worker is determined unacceptable by a specific client or customer.

(4) Assigns or reassigns the worker to perform services for a client or customer.

(5) Sets the rate of pay of the worker, whether or not through negotiation.

(6) Pays the worker from its own account or accounts.

(7) Retains the right to hire and terminate workers.

(c) If an individual or entity contracts to supply an employee to perform services for a
 customer or client, and is a leasing employer or a temporary services employer, the individual or entity is the employer of the employee who performs the services. If an individual or entity contracts to supply an employee to perform services for a client or customer and is not a leasing employer or a temporary services employer, the client or customer is the employer of the employee who performs the services. An individual or entity that contracts to supply an employee to perform services for a customer or client and pays wages to the employee for the services, but is not a leasing employer or a temporary services employer, pays the wages as the agent of the employer.

(d) In circumstances which are in essence the loan of an employee from one employer to another employer wherein direction and control of the manner and means of performing the services changes to the employer to whom the employee is loaned, the loaning employer shall continue to
 be the employer of the employee if the loaning employer continues to pay remuneration to the employee, whether or not reimbursed by the other employer. If the employer to whom the employee is loaned pays remuneration to the employee for the services performed, that employer shall be considered the employer for the purposes of any remuneration paid to the employee by the employer, regardless of whether the loaning employer also pays remuneration to the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 296, Sec. 4.   (AB 5)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

607.

If the services performed during one-half or more of any pay period by an employee for the person employing him constitute employment, all the services of the employee for that period shall be deemed to be employment; but if the services performed during more than one-half of any pay period by an employee for the person employing him do not constitute employment, then none of the services of the employee for that period shall be deemed to be employment.

As used in this section “pay period” means a period of not more than 31 consecutive days for which a payment of remuneration is ordinarily made to the employee by the person employing him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

608.

“Employment”, except as provided by Section 634.5, includes service excluded from “employment” under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act solely by reason of paragraph (8) of Section 3306(c) of that act because it is service performed in the employ of a religious, charitable, educational, or other nonprofit organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 which is exempt from income tax under Section 501(a) of that code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

609.

(a) “Employment” includes service performed for an employing unit on or in connection with an American vessel operating on navigable waters within or within and without the United States or on or in connection with an American aircraft operating within or within and without the United States, if the employing unit maintains in this state an operating office from which the operations of the American vessel or American aircraft are ordinarily and regularly supervised, managed, directed, and controlled, and such services are included in “employment” under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act. 

(b) All of the provisions of this division shall be applicable to an employing unit and to service performed in “employment” under this section in the same manner and to the same extent as to all other employers, and the wage credits given to, and the payment of benefits to, any employee of an employing unit under this section shall be in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as applied to employees of other employers under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1107.)
-------------------------------------------

610.

“Employment” shall include the service of an individual who is a citizen of the United States, performed outside the United States (except in Canada), after December 31, 1971, in the employ of an American employer as defined in Section 125.4 other than service that is deemed “employment” under Section 602 or 603 or the equivalent provisions of another state’s unemployment compensation law, if:

(a) The employer’s principal place of business in the United States is located in this state; or

(b) The employer has no place of business in the United States, but:

(1) The employer is an individual who is a resident of this state; or

(2) The employer is a corporation or limited liability company that is organized under the laws of this state; or

(3) The employer is a partnership or a trust and the number of the partners or trustees who are residents of this state is greater than the number who are residents of any one other state; or

(c) None of the criteria of subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section is met but the employer has elected coverage in this state or, the employer having failed to elect coverage in any state, the individual has filed a claim for benefits, based on such service, under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 81.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

611.

“Employment” includes agricultural labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 591.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Employee [621. - 623.]

621.

“Employee” means all of the following:

(a) Any officer of a corporation.

(b) Any individual providing labor or services for remuneration has the status of an employee rather than an independent contractor unless the hiring entity demonstrates all of the following conditions:

(1) The individual is free from the control and direction of the hiring entity in connection with the performance of the work, both under the contract for the performance of the work and in fact.

(2) The individual performs work that is outside the usual course of the hiring entity’s business.

(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, or business of the same nature as that involved in the work performed.

(c) (1) Any individual, other than an individual who is an employee under subdivision (a) or (b), who performs services for remuneration for any employing unit if the contract of service contemplates that substantially all of those services are to be performed personally by that individual either:

(A) As an agent-driver or commission-driver engaged in distributing meat products, vegetable products, fruit products, bakery products, beverages (other than milk), or laundry or drycleaning services, for their principal.

(B) As a traveling or city salesperson, other than as an
 agent-driver or commission-driver, engaged upon a full-time basis in the solicitation on behalf of, and the transmission to, their principal (except for sideline sales activities on behalf of some other person) of orders from wholesalers, retailers, contractors, or operators of hotels, restaurants, or other similar establishments for merchandise for resale or supplies for use in their business operations.

(C) As a home worker performing work, according to specifications furnished by the person for whom the services are performed, on materials or goods furnished by that person that are required to be returned to that person or a designee thereof.

(2) An individual shall not be included in the term “employee” under the provisions of this subdivision if that individual has a substantial investment in facilities used in connection with the performance of those services, other than in
 facilities for transportation, or if the services are in the nature of a single transaction not part of a continuing relationship with the employing unit for whom the services are performed.

(d) Any individual who is an employee pursuant to Section 601.5 or 686.

(e) Any individual whose services are in subject employment pursuant to an election for coverage under any provision of Article 4 (commencing with Section 701) of this chapter.

(f) Any member of a limited liability company that is treated as a corporation for federal income tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 296, Sec. 5.   (AB 5)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

621.5.

(a) “Employee” also means any individual who is an employee, pursuant to Section 2750.5 of the Labor Code, of a person who holds a valid state contractor’s license pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) When subdivision (a) does not apply, “employee” shall also mean any individual who is an employee, pursuant to Section 2750.5 of the Labor Code, of a person who is required to obtain a valid state contractor’s license pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

622.

(a) “Employee” does not include a director of a corporation or association performing services in his or her capacity as a director. This section shall not apply to service included in “employment” pursuant to Sections 605, 608, 709, and 710.

(b) “Services in his or her capacity as a director” includes either:

(1) Presence at meetings of the board of directors, even though no further service is performed at the meeting.

(2) Services customarily performed by directors in attending meetings of the board of directors such as prescribing, regulating, and guiding the policies and administration of the corporation or association.

(c) “Services in his or her capacity as a director” does not include services performed by a director in addition to, or other than those described in subdivision (b) of this section. For example, services performed as an officer of the corporation or association, or as a member of a committee which executes the policies and administrative decisions adopted by the board of directors such as advisory, appraisal, auditing, credit, examining, executive, loan or similar committees are not “services in his or her capacity as a director”.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

“Employee” does not include any member of a limited liability company that is treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Excluded Services [629. - 657.]

629.

(a) “Employment” does not include domestic service in a private home, except that “employment” includes domestic service in a private home if performed for an employing unit or a person who paid in cash remuneration of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more to individuals employed in the domestic service in any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding calendar year.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “employment” does not include work performed by a domestic worker for whom an employment agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (h) of Section 1812.501 of the Civil Code, procures, offers, refers, provides, or attempts to provide domestic work in a private home, if all of the factors set forth in Section 687.2 characterize the nature of the relationship between the employment agency and the domestic worker for whom the agency procures, offers, refers, provides, or attempts to provide domestic work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1275, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

630.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 621 or Section 13004, “employment” does not include service as a transcriber of depositions, court proceedings, and hearings performed away from the office of the person, firm, or association obligated to produce a transcript of these proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

631.

“Employment” does not include service performed by a child under the age of 18 years in the employ of his father or mother, or service performed by an individual in the employ of his son, daughter, or spouse, except to the extent that the employer and the employee have, pursuant to Section 702.5, elected to make contributions to the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

632.

“Employment” does not include service performed in the employ of any other state or its political subdivisions or in the employ of the United States government or of any instrumentality of the United States, but if Congress permits the states to require any instrumentalities of the United States to make payments into a fund under a state unemployment compensation act, and to comply with state regulations thereunder, then, to the extent permitted by Congress, all of the provisions of this division shall be applicable to the instrumentalities and to services performed for the instrumentalities in the same manner, to the same extent, and on the same terms as to all other employers, employing units, individuals, and services.

If this state is not certified by the Secretary of Labor under Section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for any year, then the payments required of the instrumentalities and their workers with respect to the year shall be refunded from the Unemployment Fund without interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1010, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

633.
